scribus/dicts/hyph_fi.dic
ISO8859-1
% First release January -86 by Kauko Saarinen,
% Computing Centre, University of Jyvaskyla, Finland
%
% Completely rewritten January -88. The new patterns make
% much less mistakes with foreign and compound words.
% The article "Automatic Hyphenation of Finnish"
% by Professor Fred Karlsson is also referred
%
% 8th March -89 (vers. 2.2), some vowel triples by Fred Karlsson added.
% 9th January - 95: added \uccode and \lccode by Thomas Esser
% 3rd November - 04: converted to ALTLinux LibHnj format by Jarno Elonen
%
% Patterns may be freely distributed
c1ha
char1se
1ba
1be
1bi
1bo
1bu
1by
1da
1de
1di
1do
1du
1dy
1dä
1dö
1fa
1fe
1fi
1fo
1fu
1fy
1ga
1ge
1gi
1go
1gu
1gy
1gä
1gö
1ha
1he
1hi
1ho
1hu
1hy
1hä
1hö
1ja
1je
1ji
1jo
1ju
1jy
1jä
1jö
1ka
1ke
1ki
1ko
1ku
1ky
1kä
1kö
1la
1le
1li
1lo
1lu
1ly
1lä
1lö
1ma
1me
1mi
1mo
1mu
1my
1mä
1mö
1na
1ne
1ni
1no
1nu
1ny
1nä
1nö
1pa
1pe
1pi
1po
1pu
1py
1pä
1pö
1ra
1re
1ri
1ro
1ru
1ry
1rä
1rö
1sa
1se
1si
1so
1su
1sy
1sä
1sö
1ta
1te
1ti
1to
1tu
1ty
1tä
1tö
1va
1ve
1vi
1vo
1vu
1vy
1vä
1vö
1st2r  
ä2y
y1a2
y1o2
o1y
ö2y
u1y2
y1u2
ö3a2
ö3o2
ä3a2
ä3o2
ä1u2
ö1u2
a1ä    
a1ö
o1ä
o1ö
u1ä2
u1ö2
ä2ä
ö2ö
ä2ö
ö2ä
aa1i2    
aa1e2
aa1o2    
aa1u2    
ee1a2    
ee1i2    
ee1u2    
ee1y2
ii1a2
ii1e2
ii1o2
uu1a2
uu1e2    
uu1o2    
uu1i2    
e1aa
i1aa
o1aa
u1aa
u1ee
a1uu     
i1uu     
e1uu     
o1uu     
ää1i
ää1e
ää3y
i1ä2ä
e1ä2ä
y1ä2ä
i1öö  
iö2ö
a1ei
a1oi
e1ai
i1au
y1ei
ai1a
ai1e
ai1o
ai1u
au1a
au1e
eu1a
ie1a
ie1o
ie1y
io1a2
io1e2
iu1a
iu1e
iu1o
oi1a
oi1e
oi1o
oi1u
o1ui 
ou1e
ou1o
ue1a
ui1e
uo1a
uo1u
e1ö2
ö1e2
.ä2     
u2s         
yli1o2p     
y1li
ali1a2v     
a1li
1sp2li      
sp2l
sp1li
alous1
a1lo
keus1       
rtaus1
r1ta
2s1ohje     
soh1je
2s1a2sia    
sa1si
1a2sian     
a1si
1a2siat     
1a2sioi     
r2as l2as   
ras 1la
2s1o2pisk   
so1pi
2n1o2pet
no1pe
2s1a2loi
sa1lo
2n1o2pist    
no1pi
2s1o2pist
2s1o2sa      
so1sa
2n1o2sa      
no1sa
alkei2s1
al1ke
perus1
pe1ru
2s1i2dea. 2s1i2dean
si1de
sidea. 1si
sidea. si1de
2s1e2sity    
se1si
sesi1ty
2n1e2dus     
ne1du
2s1ajatu     
sa1ja
saja1tu
2s1a1se
2s1a1pu
2s1y2rit     
sy1ri
.ydi2n1
.y1di
.suu2r1a2    
.1su
.suu1ra
2s1y2h1ti
2n1otto 2n1oton
not1to
notto 1no
notto no1to
2n1anto 2n1an1no
nan1to
nanto 1na
2n1a2jan 2n1ai1ka
na1ja
najan 1na
2n1o2mai
no1ma
2n1y2lit
ny1li
2s1a2len
sa1le
2n1a2len
na1le
1a2siaka2s1
asia1ka
ulo2s1        
u1lo
2n1a2jo       
na1jo
2s1a2jo
b2l 1b2lo bib3li
bl b1lo
bl blo 1bi
b2r 1b2ri 1b2ro 1b2ru
br b1ri
br bri b1ro
d2r 1d2ra
f2l 1f2la
f2r 1f2ra 1f2re
fr f1ra
g2l 1g2lo
g2r 1g2ra
k2l
1k2ra 1k2re 1k2ri
k1ra
kra k1re
1k2v 1k2va
p2l
p2r 1p2ro
c2l
q2v 1q2vi
sc2h ts2h
ch2r
